Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.275

Regulation of automatic number or location identification—Prohibited.

No code city may enact or enforce an ordinance or regulation mandating automatic number identification or automatic location identification for a private telecommunications system or for a provider of private shared telecommunications services.

[ 1995 c 243 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1995 c 243: See notes following RCW 80.36.555.